Utah statutes.
20A-3-108.   Assisting disabled, illiterate, or blind voters.

(1)  Any voter who is blind, disabled, unable to read or write, unable to read or write the English language, or is physically unable to enter a polling place, may be given assistance by a person of the voter's choice.

(2)  The person providing assistance may not be:

(a)  the voter's employer;

(b)  an agent of the employer;

(c)  an officer or agent of the voter's union; or

(d)  a candidate.

(3)  The person providing assistance may not request, persuade, or otherwise induce the voter to vote for or vote against any particular candidate or issue or release any information regarding the voter's selection.

(4)  Each time a voter is assisted, the poll worker shall note that fact in the official register and the pollbook.

